Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1512
Family trust, defined.

Family trust shall mean a trust:

(1) In which a majority interest in the trust is held by and the majority of the beneficiaries are persons related to each other as spouse, parent, grandparent, lineal descendants of grandparents or their spouses and other legal descendants of the grandparents or their spouses, or persons acting in a fiduciary capacity for persons so related; and

(2) In which all the beneficiaries are natural persons, who are not acting as a trustee or in a similar capacity for a trust, as defined in section 76-1511, or persons acting in a fiduciary capacity, or nonprofit corporation.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 6.